Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 64
PRIVATE OCCUPATIONAL SCHOOLS

Editor's note:

This article 64 was added with relocations in 2017. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article 64, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

23-64-101. Short title.

The short title of this article 64 is the "Private Occupational Education Act of 1981".

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1177, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-101 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-102. Legislative declaration.

It is the purpose of this article 64 to provide standards for and to foster and improve private occupational schools and their educational services and to protect the citizens of this state against fraudulent or substandard private occupational schools by:

Prohibiting the use of false or misleading literature, advertising, or representations by private occupational schools or their agents;

Establishing accountability for private occupational schools and their agents through the setting of standards relative to the quality of educational services, fiscal responsibility, and ethical business practices;

Providing for the preservation of essential records;

Providing certain rights and remedies to the private occupational school division, the private occupational school board created in section 23-64-107, and the consuming public necessary to effectuate the purposes of this article 64;

Providing for the authorization of appropriate educational credentials by approved schools, including, but not limited to, certificates, diplomas, and associate degrees; and

Providing train-out for students of private occupational schools ceasing operation.

To these ends, this article 64 shall be liberally construed.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1177, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-102 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 64, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Administrative law judge" means a person, appointed by the authority from a list provided by the attorney general, who shall conduct hearings on any matter that is within the jurisdiction of the division and that is referred to the administrative law judge by the division.

"Agent" means any person owning any interest in, employed by, or representing for remuneration or other consideration a private occupational school located within or without this state who enrolls or who, in places other than the principal school premises, offers or attempts to secure the enrollment of any person within this state for education in a school.

"Agent's permit" means a nontransferable written authorization issued to an agent pursuant to the provisions of this article 64 by the division upon approval by the executive director.

"Associate degree" means a degree offered by a school on the successful completion of the degree requirements as established by the division.

"Board" means the private occupational school board created in section 23-64-107.

"Ceasing operation" means the voluntary discontinuation of operation by a private occupational school or the discontinuation of operation by a private occupational school due to the denial, expiration, revocation, or suspension of the school's certificate of approval by the division.

"Certificate" means an award for the successful completion of a specific course or program objective.

"Certificate of approval" means a written authorization issued by the division, upon approval by the executive director, to the principal owners of a school in the name of the school, pursuant to the provisions of this article 64, to operate a school in this state.

"Diploma" means an award for the successful completion of an approved prescribed program of study in a particular field of endeavor.

"Director" means the director of the private occupational school division created pursuant to section 23-64-105.

"Division" means the private occupational school division created pursuant to section 23-64-105.

"Educational credentials" means certificates, diplomas, associate degrees, transcripts, reports, numbers, or words that signify or are generally taken to signify enrollment, attendance, progress, or satisfactory completion of the requirements for education at a school.

"Educational services" or "education" includes, but is not limited to, any class, course, or program of training, instruction, or study that is designed or is purported to meet all or part of the requirements for employment in an agricultural, trade, industrial, technical, business, office, sales, service, or health occupation and constitutes occupational education.

"Entity" includes, but is not limited to, any person, society, association, partnership, corporation, or trust.

"Executive director" means the executive director of the department of higher education appointed pursuant to section 23-1-110 (2).

"New school" means a private occupational school that does not hold an existing certificate of approval as of June 30, 1981, or a school holding an existing certificate of approval as of June 30, 1981, that subsequently expires pursuant to the provisions of section 23-64-114 (4) or is revoked or denied pursuant to the provisions of this article 64.

"Occupational education" means any education designed to facilitate the vocational, technical, or occupational development of individual persons, including, but not limited to, vocational or technical training or retraining that is given in schools or classes, including field or laboratory work incident thereto, that is conducted as a part of a program designed to fit individuals for gainful employment as semiskilled or skilled workers or technicians in recognized occupations requiring less than a four-year baccalaureate degree. The term also includes instruction related to the occupation for which the person is being trained or that is necessary for him or her to benefit from the training.

"Offer" or "offering" includes, in addition to its usual meaning, advertising, publicizing, soliciting, or encouraging any person in any manner to perform the act described.

"Operate" or "operating", when used with respect to a school, means to establish, keep, or maintain any facility or location in this state where, from, or through which educational services are offered or educational credentials are offered or granted.

"Private occupational school" or "school" means any entity or institution for profit or not for profit located within or without this state that offers educational credentials or educational services that constitute occupational education in this state and that is not specifically exempt from the provisions of this article 64.

"Train-out" means the opportunity for a student of a private occupational school ceasing operation to meet the student's educational objectives through training provided by another approved private occupational school, a community college, an area technical college, or any other training arrangement acceptable to the division.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1178, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-103 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-104. Exemptions.

The following educational institutions and educational services are exempt from this article 64:

A public school or public educational institution funded wholly or in part by a local school district or school districts or by direct appropriation from the state to a school, public educational institution, or board;

A nonprofit school owned, controlled, operated, and maintained by a bona fide parochial or denominational institution exempt from general property taxation under the laws of this state;

A school offering education solely avocational, supplementary, or ancillary in nature;

A college or university that:

Confers four-year baccalaureate or higher degrees; and

Offers programs or courses in this state, the majority of which are not occupational in nature, as defined by the division, or are at the graduate level;

A private school providing a basic academic education comparable to that provided in public elementary and secondary schools of this state;

A school offering only educational services for which no money or other consideration is paid;

A school offering only educational services to an employer for the training of its employees;

Education offered by a bona fide trade, business, professional, or fraternal organization that primarily benefits the organization's membership or mission;

Educational services offered by an employer for the training of its own employees;

Apprenticeship training registered pursuant to state or federal law;

Educational services offered by an approved school that:

Do not require the payment of money or other consideration;

Are avocational, supplementary, or ancillary in nature; or

Are offered only to an employer for the training and preparation of his or her employees;

Nurse aide training programs approved pursuant to section 12-255-118.5 (1);

Flight schools that are approved and regulated by the federal aviation administration;

A private educational institution that is accredited by an agency recognized by the United States department of education, that confers post-graduate degrees, and that offers programs or courses that are not defined as occupational education pursuant to section 23-64-103 (17);

A continuing professional education program that meets the requirements for maintaining or renewing a professional license issued by a Colorado state professional licensing entity so long as the continuing professional education program or the organization that provides the program is approved by the Colorado state professional licensing entity either before or after a licensee attends the program. To qualify for the exemption created in this subsection (1)(o), a continuing professional education program must be consistent with the purposes or requirements of the organization that provides the program.

Yoga teacher training courses, programs, and schools; and

Training of guides, trip leaders, and guide instructors by river outfitters licensed pursuant to section 33-32-104.

An educational institution or educational service described in subsection (1) of this section may waive its exempt status in order to apply for authorization to operate a private occupational school pursuant to this article 64 by submitting the waiver in writing to the board. The following applies to an educational institution or educational service that waives its exempt status:

An educational institution's or educational service's waiver of its exempt status does not guarantee the approval of the educational institution or educational service as a private occupational school, and an educational institution or educational service that waives exempt status pursuant to this subsection (2) must apply for a certificate of approval as described in section 23-64-114; and

Upon the issuance of a certificate of approval pursuant to section 23-64-115, the educational institution or educational service submits to all applicable provisions of this article 64 and any rules promulgated in association with this article 64 for the full term of the certificate of approval.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1180, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

IP(1) and (1)(p) amended and (1)(q) added, (SB 19-160), ch. 416, p. 3662, § 3, effective August 2; (1)(l) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1685, § 123, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(1)(l) amended, (HB 20-1183), ch. 157, p. 701, § 54, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(2) added, (HB 21-1306), ch. 310, p. 1898, § 6, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-104 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-105. Private occupational school division - creation.

The private occupational school division and the office of the director of the division are created in the department of higher education. The division and the office of the director of the division are

type 2

entities, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercise their powers and perform their duties and functions specified in this article 64 under the department of higher education and the executive director of the department. The director is appointed by the executive director. The director, with the approval of the executive director, shall employ such professional and clerical personnel as deemed necessary to carry out the duties and functions of the division. The director and professional personnel hold educational offices and are exempt from the state personnel system.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1181, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3354, § 14, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-104.1 as it existed prior to 2017.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

23-64-106. Powers and duties of division.

The division shall have, in addition to the powers and duties now vested therein by law, the following powers and duties:

To publish a list of schools and maintain a list of agents authorized to operate in this state under the provisions of this article 64;

To receive or cause to be maintained as a permanent file, in conformity with section 23-64-125, copies of educational, financial, and other records;

To negotiate and enter into interstate reciprocity agreements with similar agencies in other states whenever, in the judgment of the division and the board, such agreements are or will be helpful in effectuating the purposes of this article 64; except that nothing contained in any such reciprocity agreement shall be construed as limiting the division's powers, duties, and responsibilities with respect to investigating or acting upon any application for a certificate of approval for a private occupational school or an application for issuance of or renewal of any agent's permit or with respect to the enforcement of any provision of this article 64 or any of the rules promulgated under this article 64.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1182, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-105 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-107. Private occupational school board - established - membership.

Repealed.

There is established, in the private occupational school division, the private occupational school board that shall advise the director on the administration of this article 64 and has the powers and duties specified in section 23-64-108. The board is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercises its powers and performs its duties and functions as specified in this article 64.

The board shall consist of seven members appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, as follows:

Three members shall be owners or operators of private occupational schools that receive Title IV funds;

Four members shall be representatives of the general public, at least one of whom is employed by a lending institution located in Colorado and is familiar with federal loans and funds authorized in Title IV of the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", as amended, and at least two of whom are owners or operators of businesses within Colorado that employ students who are enrolled in schools that are subject to administration by the division.

No appointed member shall be an employee of any local district college, community or technical college, school district, or public agency that receives vocational funds allocated by any state agency.

The board members shall serve four-year terms; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than four members' terms expire in the same year. A member shall not serve more than two consecutive four-year terms.

The board shall hold regular meetings at such times as it may deem appropriate, but it shall not meet less than four times per year.

Board members shall be paid a per diem of thirty-five dollars for each day on which the board meets and their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the conduct of official business.

The division shall provide any necessary staff assistance for the board.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1182, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2022:

(1) repealed and (2) and (5) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 44, § 53, effective February 25; (2) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3355, § 15, effective August 10.

23-64-108. Powers and duties of board - rules.

The board shall have the following powers and duties:

To establish minimum criteria in conformity with section 23-64-112, including quality of education, ethical business practices, and fiscal responsibility, that an applicant for a certificate of approval shall meet before the certificate of approval may be issued and continued in effect. The criteria to be developed under this section shall be such as will effectuate the purposes of this article 64.

To establish minimum criteria in conformity with section 23-64-112 that an applicant for an agent's permit shall meet before the agent's permit may be issued and continued in effect. The criteria to be developed under this section shall be such as will effectuate the purposes of this article 64.

To consult with the division regarding interstate reciprocity agreements;

To receive, investigate, and evaluate, as it deems necessary, and act upon applications for certificates of approval, agents' permits, and changes of ownership;

To require the posting of appropriate notices on the school premises notifying students of any school closure by operation of law or otherwise;

To investigate, as it deems necessary, any entity subject to, or reasonably believed by the board to be subject to, the jurisdiction of this article 64 and, in connection therewith, to subpoena any persons, books, records, or documents pertaining to the investigation; to require answers in writing, under oath, to questions propounded by the board; and to administer an oath or affirmation to any person in connection with any such investigation. The investigation may include the physical inspection of school facilities and records. The subpoena shall be enforceable by any court of record of this state.

To deny or revoke the agent's permit of an agent of an out-of-state school determined not to be in compliance with this article 64;

To appoint administrative law judges to conduct hearings on any matter within the jurisdiction of the board, which shall include the conduct of hearings in aid of any investigation or inquiry pursuant to subsection (1)(f) of this section;

To promulgate rules and to adopt procedures necessary or appropriate for the conduct of its work and the implementation of this article 64;

To establish educational standards and requirements for the awarding of appropriate educational credentials by private occupational schools;

To exercise other powers and duties implied, but not enumerated, in this section that, in the judgment of the board, are necessary in order to carry out the provisions of this article 64;

To designate, by category of instruction, those schools that teach students under sixteen years of age for which instructional staff and prospective instructional staff, as defined by board rule, shall be required to submit a complete set of fingerprints pursuant to section 23-64-110;

To prescribe uniform academic reporting policies and procedures to which a private occupational school shall adhere.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1183, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-105.3 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-109. Duties of private occupational schools.

A private occupational school shall provide the division with such data as the board deems necessary upon written request of the board. Data pertaining to individual students or personnel shall not be divulged or made known in any way by a member of the board, by the director, or by any division or school employee, except in accordance with judicial order or as otherwise provided by law. A person who violates this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501. In addition, the person shall be subject to removal or dismissal from public service on grounds of malfeasance in office.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1185, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3223, § 401, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-105.4 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-110. Submittal of fingerprints for persons teaching at designated schools - fingerprint-based criminal history record checks - prerequisite for commencing or continuing employment.

Instructional staff or prospective instructional staff who may be teaching students in a school designated by the board pursuant to section 23-64-108 (1)(l) shall, beginning July 1, 2006, in order to commence or continue employment at a designated school, submit a set of his or her fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting a state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record check utilizing records of the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. Nothing in this section precludes the board from making further inquiries into the background of instructional staff or prospective instructional staff. Instructional staff or prospective instructional staff shall pay the fee established by the Colorado bureau of investigation for conducting the fingerprint-based criminal history record check. Upon completion of the criminal history record check, the bureau shall forward the results to the board. The board shall conduct a review of the results of the criminal history record check forwarded by the bureau and consider the results in assessing whether instructional staff or prospective instructional staff meet minimum standards of qualification, as established by the board pursuant to section 23-64-112, necessary to commence or continue employment at the designated school.
(1) (a) (I) Instructional staff or prospective instructional staff who may be teaching students in a school designated by the board pursuant to section 23-64-108 (1)(l) shall, beginning July 1, 2006, in order to commence or continue employment at a designated school, submit a set of his or her fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting a state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record check utilizing records of the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. Nothing in this section precludes the board from making further inquiries into the background of instructional staff or prospective instructional staff. Instructional staff or prospective instructional staff shall pay the fee established by the Colorado bureau of investigation for conducting the fingerprint-based criminal history record check. Upon completion of the criminal history record check, the bureau shall forward the results to the board. The board shall conduct a review of the results of the criminal history record check forwarded by the bureau and consider the results in assessing whether instructional staff or prospective instructional staff meet minimum standards of qualification, as established by the board pursuant to section 23-64-112, necessary to commence or continue employment at the designated school.

When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check of instructional staff or prospective instructional staff performed pursuant to this section reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the board shall require the instructional staff or prospective instructional staff to submit to a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d). Instructional staff or prospective instructional staff shall pay the fee established by the board for conducting the named-based judicial record check.

Instructional staff or prospective instructional staff shall be required to resubmit a set of his or her fingerprints pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section even if he or she previously submitted his or her fingerprints pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section.

In addition to any other requirements established by the board for the necessary qualifications of instructional staff or prospective instructional staff, the submittal of fingerprints pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and results consistent with the minimum standards of qualification established by the board pursuant to section 23-64-112 shall be a prerequisite to commencing or continuing employment as instructional staff who may be teaching students in a school designated by the board pursuant to section 23-64-108 (1)(l).

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1185, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 19-1166), ch. 125, p. 549, § 29, effective April 18.

L. 2022:

(1)(a)(II) amended, (SB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 522, § 31, effective April 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-105.7 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-111. Duties and powers of the division subject to approval of the executive director.

The division shall exercise all of the powers and duties set forth in section 23-64-106. The executive director shall review and approve, consistent with the institutional role and statewide needs, any action taken by the division pursuant to the powers and duties set forth in section 23-64-106; except that the participation of the executive director shall not be required in any action taken by the board.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1185, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-105.9 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-112. Minimum standards.

In establishing the criteria required by section 23-64-108 (1)(a), (1)(b), and (1)(j), the board shall observe and require compliance with at least the following minimum standards for all schools:

That the school can demonstrate that it has sufficient financial resources to:

Fulfill its commitments to students;

Make refunds of tuition and fees to the extent and in the manner set forth in this article 64; and

Meet the school's financial obligations;

That the school shall furnish and maintain surety bonds as required by this article 64;

That the educational services are such as will adequately achieve the stated objectives for which the educational services are offered;

That the school has adequate facilities, equipment, instructional materials, instructional staff, and other personnel to provide educational services necessary to meet the stated objectives for which the educational services are offered;

That the education and experience qualifications of administrators, instructional staff, and other personnel are such as will adequately ensure that the students will receive educational services consistent with the stated objectives for which the educational services are offered;

That the school provides each prospective student with a school catalog and other printed information describing the educational services offered and describing entrance requirements, program objectives, length of programs, schedule of tuitions, fees, all other charges and expenses necessary for the completion of the program of study, cancellation and refund policies, and such other material facts concerning the school and the program of instruction that are likely to affect the decision of a student to enroll therein as required by the board and that the information is provided to a prospective student prior to the commencement of classes and the execution of any enrollment agreement or contract;

That, upon satisfactory completion of training, the student is given appropriate educational credentials by the school; except that the school may require the payment of all tuition and fees due at the time of completion;

That adequate educational, financial, and other records are maintained by the school;

That the school adheres to procedures, standards, and policies set forth in the school catalog and other printed materials;

That the school is maintained and operated in compliance with all pertinent ordinances and laws, including rules adopted pursuant thereto, relative to the health and safety of all persons upon the premises;

That neither the school nor its agents have violated the prohibitions as set forth in section 23-64-113 or have engaged in deceptive trade or sales practices as set forth in section 23-64-123;

That the principal owners, officers, agents, administrators, and instructors are of good reputation and free from moral turpitude;

That the school provides the student with a copy of the executed enrollment agreement or contract, at the time of enrollment, that complies with this article 64;

That the school adheres to a policy for the cancellation, settlement, and refund of tuition and fees that complies with this article 64;

That an out-of-state school shall maintain records that include, but are not limited to, a list of the name and address of each student enrolled from within this state and that the records shall be made available to the board upon request;

That the school shall submit to the board the name and Colorado address of a designated agent upon whom any process, notice, or demand may be served and that the agent shall be maintained continuously. Nothing contained in this section shall limit or affect the right to serve any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon a foreign corporation in any other manner now or hereafter permitted by law.

That the school or agent shall have paid any restitution required by section 23-64-124 and any civil penalties assessed pursuant to section 23-64-127;

That an agent shall represent only a school that meets the minimum standards set forth in this section and the criteria established pursuant to section 23-64-108;

That the school shall not deny enrollment of a student or make any distinction or classification of students on account of race, color, creed, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, or marital status; and

That a school offering an associate degree is accredited by an institutional or programmatic accrediting body that is officially recognized by the United States department of education or the Council for Higher Education Accreditation.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1186, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(1)(s) amended, (HB 21-1108), ch. 156, p. 894, § 30, effective September 7; (1)(s) amended and (1)(t) added, (HB 21-1306), ch. 310, p. 1897, § 4, effective September 7.

23-64-113. Prohibitions.

No entity of whatever kind, alone or in concert with others, shall:

Operate in this state a school not exempt from the provisions of this article 64 unless the school holds a valid certificate of approval issued pursuant to the provisions of this article 64;

Offer educational services in or grant educational credentials from a school located within or without this state unless the agent holds a valid agent's permit issued pursuant to the provisions of this article 64; except that the board may promulgate rules to permit the rendering of legitimate public information services without such permit;

Accept contracts or enrollment agreements from an agent who does not hold a valid agent's permit issued pursuant to the provisions of this article 64;

Award educational credentials without requiring the completion of any education.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1187, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-107 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-114. Application for certificate of approval.

Any entity desiring to operate a private occupational school in this state shall make application for a certificate of approval to the board upon forms to be provided by the board. The application shall include at least the following:

A catalog published or proposed to be published by the school containing the information specified in the criteria promulgated by the board;

A description of the school's placement assistance, if any;

Documentation necessary to establish the applicant's financial stability as required by the minimum standards and bond provisions specified in this article 64;

Copies of media advertising and promotional literature;

Copies of all student enrollment agreement or contract forms and instruments evidencing indebtedness;

A surety bond as required by this article 64;

A fee as required by this article 64;

The name and Colorado address of a designated agent upon whom any process, notice, or demand may be served.

Each application shall be signed and certified to under oath by the owner or his or her authorized designee.

The board shall not be required to act upon an application until such time as an application is submitted as set forth in this section.

An application submitted by a school that holds a valid certificate of approval shall be submitted on or before February 15 immediately prior to the expiration of the certificate of approval. If the application as set forth in subsection (1) of this section is not submitted as set forth in this section, the school's existing certificate of approval shall expire on June 30 by operation of law, and any such application submitted after February 15 shall be treated as an application submitted by a new school.

The board shall not be required to act upon an application submitted by a school whose certificate of approval has been revoked or denied by a final nonappealable order of the board for a period of twelve months subsequent to the revocation or denial. Notwithstanding that an order of revocation or denial may be subject to judicial review, the school shall otherwise comply with and be subject to the provisions of this article 64; except that the school shall not be required to submit an application as required by this section.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1188, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-108 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-115. Issuance of certificate of approval.

Following the review and evaluation of an application for a certificate of approval and any further information required by the board to be submitted by the applicant and an investigation and appraisal of the applicant as the board deems necessary or appropriate, the board shall either grant or deny a certificate of approval to the applicant. A certificate of approval shall be issued to the applicant in the name of the school and shall state in clear and conspicuous language the name and address of the school, the date of issuance, and the term of approval.

The term for which a certificate of approval is issued shall be for three years commencing on July 1 and expiring on June 30 of the third year thereafter or upon the cessation of operation of the school. New schools shall be issued a provisional certificate of approval which shall expire on June 30 of the second year following the date of issuance or upon the cessation of operation of the school.

At any time within the period of a certificate of approval, the board may require the school to submit supplementary documentation or information deemed necessary to enable the board to determine whether the school is continuing to be operated in compliance with the provisions of this article 64.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1189, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-109 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-116. Application for change of ownership - definition.

In the event of a change of ownership of a school, the seller, prior to the effective date of the change of ownership, shall notify the board in writing, and the buyer, prior to or within thirty days after the change of ownership, shall make application for approval of the change of ownership upon forms to be provided and in a manner prescribed by the board. In the event of a failure to do so, the school's certificate of approval shall be suspended by operation of law until the application has been received and approved by the board as provided in this section.

Following the review and evaluation of an application and any further information required by the board to be submitted by the applicant and an investigation and appraisal of an applicant as the board deems necessary or appropriate, the board shall either grant or deny the application. Denial of an application shall be in the same manner as set forth in section 23-64-118 for a denial of an application for a certificate of approval; except that the board shall not be required to submit a notice of noncompliance.

"Ownership", for the purpose of this section, means ownership of a controlling interest in the school or, in the event the school is owned or controlled by a corporation or other legal entity other than a natural person, ownership of a controlling interest in the legal entity owning or controlling the school.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1189, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-110 as it existed prior to 2017.